Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska33-106.03
Dissolution of marriage; additional fees.

In addition to the fees provided for in sections 33-106 and 33-123, the clerk of the court shall collect an additional fifty dollars as a mediation fee and twenty-five dollars as a child abuse prevention fee for each complaint filed for dissolution of marriage. The fees shall be remitted to the State Treasurer who shall credit the child abuse prevention fee to the Nebraska Child Abuse Prevention Fund and the mediation fee to the Parenting Act Fund.

Laws 1986, LB 333, § 7;

Laws 1996, LB 1296, § 6;

Laws 2002, Second Spec. Sess., LB 48, § 1;

Laws 2007, LB554, § 26;

Laws 2017, LB307, § 2.